Vermont, session 2025-2026, S301.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Short Title, Purpose, and Findings * * *
Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE
This act may be cited as “the Vermont Civil Rights Sovereignty and Equal
Protection Act of 2026.”
Sec. 2. PURPOSE
The purpose of this act is to:
VT LEG #385908 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.301
2026 Page 2 of 16
(1) modernize, unify, and expand Vermont’s civil rights protections to
ensure the equal enjoyment of liberty, dignity, and opportunity for all
individuals in the State of Vermont;
(2) integrate and strengthen civil rights protections across titles;
(3) establish a comprehensive, State-funded and State-controlled civil
rights enforcement system that is fully independent of federal funding or policy
shifts; and
(4) replace lost federal civil rights enforcement capacity and mitigate
federal rollbacks by establishing Vermont-specific standards, remedies, and
institutions.
Sec. 3. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds:
(1) Federal rollbacks in civil rights enforcement, reductions in staffing,
and withdrawal of programmatic funding threaten the equal protection of
Vermonters.
(2) Vermont statutes currently contain fragmented and inconsistent
definitions, enforcement standards, and remedies, producing confusion and
uneven protection.
(3) Systemic discrimination, including discrimination that arises through
disparate impact, undermines democracy, the rule of law, and Vermont’s
constitutional commitment to equality.
VT LEG #385908 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.301
2026 Page 3 of 16
(4) Vermont must not depend on the federal government for the funding
or execution of its civil rights enforcement obligations and must build
independent, sustainable State capacity.
* * * Public Accommodations and Unfair Housing * * *
Sec. 4. 9 V.S.A. § 4500 is amended to read:
§ 4500. LEGISLATIVE INTENT
* * *
(d) It is the intent of the General Assembly that all State agencies, political
subdivisions, housing authorities, and recipients of State housing-related funds
take meaningful actions to combat discrimination, including actions that:
(1) overcome patterns of segregation;
(2) promote fair housing choice; and
(3) foster inclusive communities free from barriers that restrict access to
housing based on protected characteristics.
Sec. 5. 9 V.S.A. § 4501 is amended to read:
§ 4501. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(12)(A) “Harass” means to engage in unwelcome conduct that detracts
from, undermines, or interferes with a person’s:
VT LEG #385908 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.301
2026 Page 4 of 16
(i) use of a place of public accommodation or any of the
accommodations, advantages, facilities, goods, services, or privileges of a
place of public accommodation because of the person’s race, creed religion,
color, national origin, citizenship, immigration status, marital status, sex,
sexual orientation, gender identity, source of income, housing status, veteran
status, crime victim status, or disability; or
(ii) terms, conditions, privileges, or protections in the sale or rental
of a dwelling or other real estate, or in the provision of services or facilities in
connection with a dwelling or other real estate, because of the person’s race,
sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, marital status, religious creed
religion, color, national origin, citizenship, immigration status, veteran status,
crime victim status, or disability, or because the person intends to occupy a
dwelling with one or more minor children, or because the person is a recipient
of public assistance, or because the person is a victim of abuse, sexual assault,
or stalking.
(B) Notwithstanding any judicial precedent to the contrary, harassing
conduct need not be severe or pervasive to be unlawful pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter. In determining whether conduct constitutes
unlawful harassment:
* * *
VT LEG #385908 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.301
2026 Page 5 of 16
(iii) Conduct may constitute unlawful harassment, regardless of
whether:
* * *
(IV) despite the conduct, the complaining person was able to:
(aa) use the place of public accommodation or any of the
accommodations, advantages, facilities, goods, services, or privileges of the
place of public accommodation; or
* * *
Sec. 6. 9 V.S.A. § 4502 is amended to read:
§ 4502. PUBLIC ACCOMMODATIONS
(a) An owner or operator of a place of public accommodation or an agent
or employee of such owner or operator shall not, because of the race, creed
religion, color, national origin, citizenship, immigration status, marital status,
sex, sexual orientation, or gender identity, source of income, housing status,
veteran status, or crime victim status of any person, refuse, withhold from, or
deny to that person any of the accommodations, advantages, facilities, goods,
services, and privileges of the place of public accommodation.
* * *
Sec. 7. 9 V.S.A. § 4503 is amended to read:
§ 4503. UNFAIR HOUSING PRACTICES
(a) It shall be unlawful for any person:
VT LEG #385908 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.301
2026 Page 6 of 16
(1) To refuse to sell or rent, or refuse to negotiate for the sale or rental
of, or otherwise make unavailable or deny, a dwelling or other real estate to
any person because of the race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age,
marital status, religious creed religion, color, national origin, citizenship,
immigration status, veteran status, crime victim status, or disability of a person,
or because a person intends to occupy a dwelling with one or more minor
children, or because a person is a recipient of public assistance, or because a
person is a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or stalking.
(2) To discriminate against, or to harass, any person in the terms,
conditions, privileges, and protections of the sale or rental of a dwelling or
other real estate, or in the provision of services or facilities in connection with
a dwelling or other real estate, because of the race, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity, age, marital status, religious creed religion, color, national
origin, citizenship, immigration status, veteran status, crime victim status, or
disability of a person, or because a person intends to occupy a dwelling with
one or more minor children, or because a person is a recipient of public
assistance, or because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or stalking.
(3) To make, print, or publish, or cause to be made, printed, or published
any notice, statement, or advertisement, with respect to the sale or rental of a
dwelling or other real estate that indicates any preference, limitation, or
discrimination based on race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age,
VT LEG #385908 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.301
2026 Page 7 of 16
marital status, religious creed religion, color, national origin, citizenship,
immigration status, veteran status, crime victim status, or disability of a person,
or because a person intends to occupy a dwelling with one or more minor
children, or because a person is a recipient of public assistance, or because a
person is a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or stalking.
(4) To represent to any person because of the race, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, age, marital status, religious creed religion, color,
national origin, citizenship, immigration status, veteran status, crime victim
status, or disability of a person, or because a person intends to occupy a
dwelling with one or more minor children, or because a person is a recipient of
public assistance, or because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or
stalking, that any dwelling or other real estate is not available for inspection,
sale, or rental when the dwelling or real estate is in fact so available.
* * *
(6) To discriminate against any person in the making or purchasing of
loans or providing other financial assistance for real-estate-related transactions
or in the selling, brokering, or appraising of residential real property, because
of the race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, marital status,
religious creed religion, color, national origin, citizenship, immigration status,
veteran status, crime victim status, or disability of a person, or because a
person intends to occupy a dwelling with one or more minor children, or
VT LEG #385908 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.301
2026 Page 8 of 16
because a person is a recipient of public assistance, or because a person is a
victim of abuse, sexual assault, or stalking.
(7) To engage in blockbusting practices, for profit, which may include
inducing or attempting to induce a person to sell or rent a dwelling by
representations regarding the entry into the neighborhood of a person or
persons of a particular race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age,
marital status, religious creed religion, color, national origin, citizenship,
immigration status, veteran status, crime victim status, or disability of a person,
or because a person intends to occupy a dwelling with one or more minor
children, or because a person is a recipient of public assistance, or because a
person is a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or stalking.
(8) To deny any person access to or membership or participation in any
multiple listing service, real estate brokers’ organization, or other service,
organization, or facility relating to the business of selling or renting dwellings,
or to discriminate against any person in the terms or conditions of such access,
membership, or participation, on account of race, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity, age, marital status, religious creed religion, color, national
origin, citizenship, immigration status, veteran status, crime victim status, or
disability of a person, or because a person is a recipient of public assistance, or
because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or stalking.
* * *
VT LEG #385908 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.301
2026 Page 9 of 16
(12) To discriminate in land use decisions or in the permitting of
housing because of race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, marital
status, religious creed religion, color, national origin, citizenship, immigration
status, veteran status, crime victim status, disability, the presence of one or
more minor children, income, or because of the receipt of public assistance, or
because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or stalking, except as
otherwise provided by law.
* * *
* * * Hate-Motivated Crimes * * *
Sec. 8. 13 V.S.A. § 1455 is amended to read:
§ 1455. HATE-MOTIVATED CRIMES
* * *
(c) As used in this section, “protected category” includes race, color,
religion, national origin, sex, ancestry, age, service in the U.S. Armed Forces
or the National Guard, disability as defined by 21 V.S.A. § 495d(5), sexual
orientation, gender identity, citizenship, immigration status, marital status,
source of income, housing status, crime victim status, and perceived
membership in any such group.
* * * Mandatory Trainings * * *
Sec. 9. 21 V.S.A. § 495q is added to read:
§ 495q. MANDATORY TRAINING
VT LEG #385908 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.301
2026 Page 10 of 16
(a) “Municipal employer” means an employer as defined in subdivision
1722(13) of this title.
(b) The Executive Branch of the State of Vermont and all municipal
employers shall provide mandatory training to employees on the provisions of
chapter 5, subchapter 6 of this title.
* * * Civil Rights Council and Special Fund * * *
Sec. 10. 3 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 3 is added to read:
Subchapter 3. Civil Rights and Equal Protection
§ 171. CIVIL RIGHTS COORDINATING COUNCIL
(a) Creation. The Civil Rights Coordinating Council is created to ensure
statewide alignment, coordination, and accountability across civil rights
enforcement agencies, entities, and programs.
(b) Membership. The Council shall be overseen by the Office of the
Attorney General and shall be composed of the following members:
(1) the Attorney General or designee;
(2) the Executive Director of the Vermont Human Rights Commission
or designee;
(3) the Executive Director of Racial Equity or designee;
(4) the Commissioner of Housing and Community Development or
designee;
(5) the Commissioner of Labor or designee;
VT LEG #385908 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.301
2026 Page 11 of 16
(6) the Commissioner of Public Safety or designee;
(7) the Commissioner of Health or designee;
(8) one member of a municipal civil-rights board, appointed by the
Vermont League of Cities and Towns;
(9) one member of a school district or supervisory union, appointed by
the Vermont School Boards Association;
(10) one member with lived experience of discrimination, appointed by
the Vermont Human Rights Commission;
(11) one member representing a community civil rights or racial justice
organization, appointed by the Governor;
(12) one member representing the rights of individuals with disabilities,
appointed by the Vermont Developmental Disabilities Council; and
(13) one member representing the LGBTQ+ community, appointed by
the Pride Center of Vermont or successor organization.
(c) Duties and responsibilities. The Council shall:
(1) coordinate and ensure alignment of enforcement actions among the
Attorney General, the Vermont Human Rights Commission, and the Office of
Racial Equity;
(2) develop uniform policies for handling complaints, investigations,
data collection and reporting, and analysis of disparate impacts;
VT LEG #385908 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.301
2026 Page 12 of 16
(3) develop and disseminate civil rights impact assessments and
recommendations for use in State and local government;
(4) create model curricula and minimum training requirements for
public entities on antidiscrimination, antibias, anti-oppression, and civil rights
compliance;
(5) monitor federal policy changes, court decisions, and executive
actions that may impact Vermont’s civil rights obligations and issue guidance
for proper implementation or mitigation;
(6) ensure coordinated reporting to and exchange of data with the Office
of the Attorney General’s Civil Rights Unit and the Division of Racial Justice
Statistics within the Office of Racial Equity; and
(7) develop technical assistance and model ordinances for use among
local government civil rights boards, commissions, and school districts.
(d) Meetings.
(1) The Attorney General or designee shall be the Chair of the Council.
(2) The Council shall meet at least six times per year at the call of the
Chair.
(3) Seven members of the Council shall constitute a quorum.
(e) Staffing. The Council shall have the administrative, technical, and legal
assistance of the Office of the Attorney General and the Office of Racial
VT LEG #385908 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.301
2026 Page 13 of 16
Equity. The Council may hire additional staff to be funded by the Civil Rights
and Equal Protection Special Fund created by section 172 of this title.
(f) Report. Annually, on or before November 15, the Council shall submit
a written report to the Governor, the House Committees on Government
Operations and Military Affairs and on Judiciary, the Senate Committees on
Government Operations and on Judiciary, and the Office of Racial Equity.
The report shall include:
(1) information on statewide enforcement efforts;
(2) progress made on the duties and responsibilities of the Council;
(3) an analysis of systemic barriers;
(4) recommendations for policy and statutory changes; and
(5) a summary of federal actions that pose a risk to Vermonters’ civil
rights.
§ 172. CIVIL RIGHTS AND EQUAL PROTECTION SPECIAL FUND
(a) Purpose. The purpose of this section is to create a fund to support the
enforcement of Vermont’s civil rights and equal protection laws independent
of any federal funding.
(b) Creation. There is created the Civil Rights and Equal Protection
Special Fund that shall be managed in accordance with 32 V.S.A. chapter 7,
subchapter 5. The Fund shall be administered by the Attorney General.
Monies in the Fund shall be used:
VT LEG #385908 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.301
2026 Page 14 of 16
(1) to support the staffing, operations, investigative capacity, and
community outreach of the Office of the Attorney General’s Civil Rights Unit,
the Vermont Human Rights Commission, and the Office of Racial Equity;
(2) to administer the collection of data to support the Division of Racial
Justice Statistics within the Office of Racial Equity;
(3) to provide funding for legal costs associated with the violation of a
kindergarten through grade 12 educator’s civil rights when such costs are not
covered by the liability insurance of the educator’s employer;
(4) to provide training and education on civil rights, antidiscrimination,
and anti-oppression matters;
(5) to meet public reporting and transparency requirements; and
(6) to provide grants or other financial assistance to municipalities to
comply with civil rights and equal protection laws.
(c) Sources of funding.
(1) No federal funds shall be deposited into the Fund.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the Fund shall consist
of:
(A) two percent of the cannabis excise tax revenues collected under
32 V.S.A. § 7902;
(B) two percent of the State’s revenue share from sports wagering
operators under 31 V.S.A. chapter 25;
VT LEG #385908 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.301
2026 Page 15 of 16
(C) one-quarter of one percent of the tax on alcoholic beverages
imposed by 7 V.S.A. §§ 421 and 422;
(D) one-quarter of one percent of the tax on tobacco products
imposed by 32 V.S.A. § 7811;
(E) all civil penalties, fines, and settlements recovered pursuant to:
(i) 9 V.S.A. chapter 139;
(ii) 13 V.S.A. chapter 31;
(iii) 13 V.S.A. chapter 33; and
(iv) 21 V.S.A. chapter 5; and
(F) any gifts, grants, or donations from private or philanthropic
sources to support the enforcement of State civil rights and equal protection
laws.
(3) It is the intent of the General Assembly that $12,000,000.00,
adjusted for inflation, be appropriated annually to the Fund in future years.
(d) Rulemaking authority. The Attorney General may adopt rules to
implement this section.
* * * Report * * *
Sec. 11. REPORT
On or before November 1, 2026, the Court Administrator shall report to the
General Assembly on the frequency and outcomes of special motions to strike
made pursuant to 12 V.S.A. § 1041.
VT LEG #385908 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.301
2026 Page 16 of 16
* * * Appropriations * * *
Sec. 12. APPROPRIATIONS
The sum of $15,000,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Civil Rights and Equal Protection Special Fund created by 3 V.S.A. § 172 in
fiscal year 2027 for the purposes established in that section.
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 13. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385908 v.1